Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-8,130.01
Professional matches; promoters; licenses and permits; fee.

Licenses and permits may be issued to professional mixed martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts on ice, professional muay thai, professional boxing, professional kickboxing, or professional bare-knuckle boxing promoters, whether persons, clubs, or associations, for the sole purpose of conducting professional matches under such rules and regulations as the State Athletic Commissioner shall adopt. Each application for such license shall be accompanied by a fee set by the commissioner in rule and regulation. Such fee shall be not less than one hundred dollars and not more than three hundred dollars. If the promoter is an individual, the application shall include his or her social security number.

Laws 1980, LB 849, § 17;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 222;

Laws 2002, LB 482, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB471, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB869, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB291, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB70, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB635, § 3.